incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="αγ/όρι__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>όρι</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οριού</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όρι</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όρι</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όρια</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οριών</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όρια</l><r>όρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ανταν/άκλαση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>άκλαση</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκλασης</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκλαση</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκλαση</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακλάσεις</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακλάσεων</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακλάσεως</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακλάσεις</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακλάσεις</l><r>άκλαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άνεμος__n_m">
      <e><p><l>άνεμος</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ανέμου</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άνεμο</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άνεμε</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άνεμοι</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ανέμων</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ανέμους</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άνεμοι</l><r>άνεμος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="χάο/ς__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="προ/κατάληψη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>κατάληψη</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>κατάληψης</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>κατάληψη</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>κατάληψη</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακαταλήψεις</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακαταλήψεων</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακαταλήψεως</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακαταλήψεις</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακαταλήψεις</l><r>κατάληψη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ακρ/όπολη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>όπολη</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όπολης</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όπολη</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όπολη</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οπόλεις</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οπόλεων</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οπόλεως</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οπόλεις</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οπόλεις</l><r>όπολη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="στ/έγαση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>έγαση</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έγασης</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έγαση</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έγαση</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εγάσεις</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εγάσεων</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εγάσεως</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εγάσεις</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εγάσεις</l><r>έγαση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="προ/έλευση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>έλευση</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλευσης</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλευση</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλευση</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελεύσεις</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελεύσεων</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελεύσεως</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελεύσεις</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελεύσεις</l><r>έλευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μ/άτι__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ατιού</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άτι</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ατιών</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άτια</l><r>άτι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αντ/ίσταση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ίσταση</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίστασης</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσταση</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσταση</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάσεις</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάσεων</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάσεως</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάσεις</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάσεις</l><r>ίσταση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="χάος"><i>χάο</i><par n="χάο/ς__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αγόρι"><i>αγ</i><par n="αγ/όρι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="άνεμος"><i></i><par n="/άνεμος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μάτι"><i>μ</i><par n="μ/άτι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κρεβάτι"><i>κρεβ</i><par n="μ/άτι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αντανάκλαση"><i>ανταν</i><par n="ανταν/άκλαση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="προκατάληψη"><i>προ</i><par n="προ/κατάληψη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κωμόπολη"><i>κωμ</i><par n="ακρ/όπολη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="στέγαση"><i>στ</i><par n="στ/έγαση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="αντίσταση"><i>αντ</i><par n="αντ/ίσταση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="προέλευση"><i>προ</i><par n="προ/έλευση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ακρόπολη"><i>ακρ</i><par n="ακρ/όπολη__n_f"/></e>
